Maryland, session 2026, SB0262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–208.
(a) In addition to the modification under § 10–207 of this subtitle, the amounts
under this section are subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to
determine Maryland adjusted gross income.
(x) (1) In this subsection, “eligible teacher” means an individual who is
EMPLOYED ON A FULL–TIME BASIS FOR AN ACADEMIC YEAR ENDING DURING THE
TAXABLE YEAR AS:
(I) 1. A PREKINDERGARTEN CLASSROOM TEACHER IN A
PUBLICLY FUNDED PREKINDERGARTEN PROGRAM IN THE STATE AT AN ELIGIBLE
PUBLIC PROVIDER, AS DEFINED IN § 7–1A–01 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE; OR
– 1 –

Ch. 60 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. A LEAD TEACHER OR CONSULTING TEACHER IN A
PUBLICLY FUNDED PREKINDERGARTEN PROGRAM AT AN ELIGIBLE PRIVATE
PROVIDER, AS DEFINED IN § 7–1A–01 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE; OR
(II) a kindergarten through grade 12 classroom teacher in an
elementary or secondary school in the State [on a full–time basis for an academic year
ending during the taxable year].
(2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, the subtraction allowed
under subsection (a) of this section includes up to $250 of the unreimbursed expenses paid
or incurred by an eligible teacher during a taxable year for the purchase of classroom
supplies if the supplies are used by:
(i) students in the classroom; or
(ii) the eligible teacher to prepare for or during classroom teaching.
(3) The amount allowed as a subtraction under paragraph (2) of this
subsection does not include an expense that is subtracted from federal adjusted gross
income under § 62 of the Internal Revenue Code.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 2 –